Alabama, session 2026rs, HB477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
13 Section 1. Sections 25-15-3, 25-15-5, and 25-15-7 are
14 amended to read as follows:
15 "§25-15-3
16 (a) The Alabama Workforce Board shall consist of no
17 more than 4045 members, or their designees, and meet the
18 membership criteria established by WIOA. All members, unless
19 otherwise provided in this subsection, shall be appointed by
20 the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. A
21 majority of members shall be representatives of business and
22 industry, at least one of which shall represent small
23 business. Twenty percent of the members shall be
24 representatives of workforce, including two labor
25 representatives and one apprenticeship program representative.
26 The board shall also include one representative of the WIOA
27 Title I-b programs; the State Adult Education Director; one
28 representative of the Wagner-Peyser Program; the Commissioner
Page 1

representative of the Wagner-Peyser Program; the Commissioner
HB477 Enrolled
29 of the Alabama Department of Rehabilitation Services; the
30 Chancellor of the Alabama Community College System; the
31 Secretary of Workforce; one member of the Alabama Senate
32 appointed by the presiding officer of the Senate; one member
33 of the Alabama House of Representatives appointed by the
34 Speaker of the House of Representatives; one county
35 commissioner appointed by the Governor; one mayor appointed by
36 the Governor; and the Governor or his or her designee. The
37 overall membership of the board shall be inclusive and reflect
38 the racial, gender, geographic, urban/, rural, and economic
39 diversity of the state.
40 (b) The Governor shall appoint a chair from the
41 business representatives on the board as set forth in WIOA. In
42 addition, the Governor shall appoint a vice chair from the
43 business representatives on the board.
44 (c) The Governor shall establish bylaws governing the
45 membership and activities of the board as required by WIOA and
46 its implementing regulations, including 20 C.F.R. §
47 679.110(d).
48 (d) Members may serve no more than two four-year terms
49 as provided in the bylaws established pursuant to subsection
50 (c)."
51 "§25-15-5
52 (a) There is established the Executive Committee of the
53 Alabama Workforce Board which shall be comprised of seven
54 voting members, including the Governor or the Governor's
55 designee, the Chair of the Alabama Workforce Board, and five
56 executive level business leaders who shall be appointed by the
Page 2

executive level business leaders who shall be appointed by the
HB477 Enrolled
57 Governor, and who may or may not be members of the Alabama
58 Workforce Board. The Secretary of Workforce shall serve as a
59 non-voting ex officio member of the executive committee.
60 (b) Four voting members of the executive committee
61 shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting
62 business, and decisions shall be made on the basis of a
63 majority of the quorum then present and voting.
64 (c) Members of the executive committee may participate
65 in meetings in person or by means of telephone, video
66 conference, or other similar communications equipment, so that
67 all individuals participating in the meeting may hear each
68 other at the same time. Participation by electronic means
69 shall constitute in person presence at a meeting for all
70 purposes, including for purposes of voting and establishing a
71 quorum.
72 (b)(d)(1) The appointed members of the executive
73 committee shall be appointed to serve a five-year term,
74 provided that the initial appointees' terms shall be
75 designated by the Governor as follows: one member shall serve
76 a term of one year, one member shall serve a term of two
77 years, one member shall serve a term of three years, one
78 member shall serve a term of four years, and one member shall
79 serve a term of five years.
80 (2) Any appointed member may be re-appointed, but no
81 appointed member may serve on the executive committee for more
82 than a total of 10 consecutive years from the date of initial
83 appointment. Terms shall begin on July 1 of the first year of
84 the appointed member's term and end on June 30 of the final
Page 3

the appointed member's term and end on June 30 of the final
HB477 Enrolled
85 year of that member's term.
86 (3) Notwithstanding subdivision (2), appointed members
87 of the executive committee may continue to serve after the
88 expiration of their term until their successors have been
89 appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor for the
90 unexpired term.
91 (c)(e) The Governor shall appoint a chair and vice
92 chair of the executive committee.
93 (d)(f) The executive committee shall meet at least two
94 times per year but may meet more frequently at the call of the
95 chair or the Governor.
96 (e)(g) The executive committee shall be responsible for
97 reviewing budget requests, making recommendations for the
98 expenditure of state and federal funds for workforce
99 development activities, assisting the Secretary of Workforce
100 in preparing the consolidated workforce development budget
101 recommendation, working with the Secretary of Workforce to
102 prepare the Strategic Workforce Plan, developing recommended
103 performance goals and evaluation metrics related to the
104 expenditure of state and federal funds for workforce
105 development activities, and working with the Secretary of
106 Workforce to provide oversight of the Alabama Workforce Board.
107 (f)(h) Meetings of the executive committee shall be
108 subject to the Open Meetings Act."
109 "§25-15-7
110 (a) At the direction of the Governor, the Secretary of
111 Workforce shall establish seven regional workforce boards to
112 serve as Alabama's local workforce development boards for
Page 4

serve as Alabama's local workforce development boards for
HB477 Enrolled
113 purposes of Section 107 of the Workforce Innovation and
114 Opportunity Act of 2014 (P.L. 113-128), as amended, 29 U.S.C.
115 § 3122. The Department of Workforce shall establish bylaws
116 governing the membership and activities of the regional
117 workforce boards in compliance with WIOA. The local workforce
118 development boards shall be certified by the Governor pursuant
119 to 29 U.S.C. § 3122(a).
120 (b) The Secretary of Workforce shall establish
121 geographic boundaries of the regional workforce boards and
122 criteria for the appointment of members to the regional
123 workforce boards consistent with WIOA, including 29 U.S.C. §
124 3122 and 20 C.F.R. § 679.110. One such criterion shall be a
125 duty for an appointing official to consult with the Secretary
126 of Workforce before making an appointment to a regional
127 workforce board.
128 (c) The Department of Workforce may adopt rules
129 pursuant to the Alabama Administrative Procedure Act to carry
130 out this section.
131 (d) A regional workforce board shall perform the
132 functions set forth in WIOA, including each of the following:
133 (1) Develop a local plan as provided in WIOA,
134 consistent with the WIOA State Plan and the Strategic
135 Workforce Plan.
136 (2) Publish, for core and partner agency and public
137 use, workforce research and regional labor market analysis
138 using primary state labor market information provided by the
139 department.
140 (3) Convene local workforce development system
Page 5

(3) Convene local workforce development system
HB477 Enrolled
141 stakeholders to assist in the development of the local plan.
142 (4) Lead local efforts to engage with a diverse range
143 of employers.
144 (5) Lead local efforts to develop and implement career
145 pathways.
146 (6) Lead local efforts to identify and promote
147 promising workforce development strategies.
148 (7) Lead local efforts to integrate data and technology
149 systems.
150 (e) A regional workforce board shall submit an annual
151 budget request to the Secretary of Workforce and the executive
152 committee that is consistent with the Strategic Workforce
153 Plan. A regional workforce board's annual budget submission
154 shall demonstrate that the membership of the board satisfies
155 the relevant WIOA state workforce development board membership
156 requirements, including the requirements set forth in 29
157 U.S.C. § 3122 and 20 C.F.R. § 679.320. The membership of any
158 regional workforce board may not exceed twenty25 members. A
159 regional workforce development board may not expend state or
160 federal workforce development funds except pursuant to a
161 categorical annual budget approved by the Secretary of
162 Workforce."
163 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
164 1, 2026.
Page 6

1, 2026.
HB477 Enrolled
165
166
167
168
169
170
171
172
173
174
175 ________________________________________________
176 Speaker of the House of Representatives
177
178
179
180 ________________________________________________
181 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
182
183
184 House of Representatives
185
186 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
187 was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.
188
189 John Treadwell
190 Clerk
191
192
193
194
195
196 Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed
197
198
199
Page 7